California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) Each applicant for an original or reciprocity Physicians and Surgeons Certificate shall pay an application fee in a sum not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400) at the time his or her application
 is filed.

(b) The biennial license fee, unless otherwise provided, shall be set by the board on or before November 1 of each year for the ensuing calendar year at a sum as the board determines necessary to defray the expenses of administering this chapter, under the Osteopathic Act, relating to the issuance of certificates to those applicants, which sum, however, shall not exceed four hundred dollars ($400) nor be less than twenty-five dollars ($25).

(c) The board shall set a biennial license fee in an amount less than that levied pursuant to subdivision (b) that shall be paid by any applicant who indicates to the board in writing that he or she does not intend to practice under the Osteopathic Act during the current renewal period.

(d) The fee for failure to pay the biennial license fee shall be 50 percent of the
 renewal fee but not more than two hundred dollars ($200).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 600, Sec. 2.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2455.1.

(a) In addition to the fees charged pursuant to Section 2455, and at the time those fees are charged, the board shall charge each applicant for an original or reciprocity certificate or for a biennial license an additional twenty-five-dollar ($25) fee for the purposes of this section. This twenty-five-dollar ($25) fee shall be due and payable along with the fee for the original or reciprocity certificate or the biennial license.

(b) On or before July 1, 2015, the board shall develop a mechanism for an osteopathic
 physician and surgeon to pay a voluntary contribution, at the time of initial application for licensure or biennial renewal, for the purposes of this section.

(c) The board shall transfer all funds collected pursuant to this section, on a monthly basis, to the Medically Underserved Account for Physicians created by Section 128555 of the Health and Safety Code for the purposes of the Steven M. Thompson Physician Corps Loan Repayment Program.
 Notwithstanding Section 128555 of the Health and Safety Code, these funds shall not be used to provide funding for the Physician Volunteer Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 439, Sec. 2.   (SB 1116)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2455.2.

(a) A licensed osteopathic physician and surgeon shall report to the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, at the time of initial licensure, any specialty board certification that he or she holds that is issued by a member board of the American Board of Medical Specialties or approved by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California. 

(b) A licensed osteopathic physician and surgeon shall also report to the board, at the time of license renewal, his or her practice status,
 designated as one of the following:

(1) Full-time practice in California.

(2) Full-time practice outside of California.

(3) Part-time practice in California.

(4) Medical administrative employment that does not include direct patient care.

(5) Retired.

(6) Other practice status, as may be further defined by the board.

(c) A licensed osteopathic physician and surgeon may report to the board, at the time of initial licensure and license renewal, and the board shall collect, information regarding his or her cultural background and foreign language proficiency. 

(d) The information collected pursuant to this section may be placed on the board’s Internet Web site. 

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1,
 2010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 602, Sec. 1.   (SB 620)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative July 1, 2010, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2456.

(a) Each person holding a certificate issued by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California residing in or out of California shall pay the board a biennial license fee.

(b) Fictitious name permits issued by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California as provided in Section 2415 shall expire on December 31 of each year. The initial permit fee shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) and the renewal permit fee shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 691, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2456.1.

All osteopathic physician’s and surgeon’s certificates shall be issued for two years and shall expire at midnight on the last day of the month in which the license was issued during the second year of the two-year term if not renewed on or before that day.

To renew an unexpired license, the licensee shall, on or before the dates on which it would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board and pay the prescribed renewal fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 4.   (SB 1443)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2456.2.

(a) The board shall notify in writing by certified mail, return receipt requested, any physician and surgeon who does not renew his or her license within 60 days from its date of expiration.

(b) Any licensee who does not renew his or her expired license on or before its date of expiration shall pay all the following fees:

(1) The renewal fee in effect at the time of renewal.

(2) The delinquency fee required by Section 2455.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the renewal of any expired physician’s and surgeon’s license within six months from its date of expiration shall be retroactive to the date of expiration of that license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 934, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2456.3.

Except as provided in Section 2429, a license which has expired may be renewed at any time within five years after its expiration by filing an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board and payment of all accrued renewal fees and any other fees required by Section 2455. Except as provided in Section 2456.2, renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the renewal application is filed, on the date on which the renewal fee or accrued renewal fees are paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee or the delinquency fee and penalty fee, if any, are paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect through the expiration date set forth in Section 2456.1 which next occurs after the effective date of the renewal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 934, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2457.

The failure of any person holding a certificate issued by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California to pay the biennial license fee during the time his or her certificate remains in force shall automatically work a forfeiture of his or her certificate after a period of 60 days from the date of expiration.

The certificate shall not be restored except upon written application and the payment to the Osteopathic Medical Board of California of the fee provided by this article. No examination shall be required for the reissuance of a certificate that was forfeited under the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 691, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2457.5.

(a) In addition to Article 12 (commencing with Section 2220), the charging, or obtaining of an unconscionable fee for professional services rendered to a patient by an osteopathic physician and surgeon constitutes unprofessional conduct and is grounds for disciplinary action.

(b) A fee is unconscionable within the meaning of this section when it is so exorbitant and wholly disproportionate to the services performed as to shock the conscience of physicians of ordinary prudence practicing in the same community. Factors to be considered, where appropriate, in determining the reasonableness of a fee, are based on the circumstances existing at the time of the service and shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The time and effort required.

(2) The novelty and difficulty of the procedure and treatment.

(3) The skill required to perform the procedure or treatment properly.

(4) The likelihood, if apparent to the patient, that the proper treatment of the patient will preclude the physician from remuneration from other sources.

(5) Any requirements or conditions imposed by the patient or by the circumstances.

(6) The nature and length of the professional relationship with the patient. 

(7) The experience, reputation, and ability of the physician performing the services.

(8) The results obtained.

(9) The existence of full fee disclosure and knowing patient consent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 325, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2458.

When the prosecution for a violation of this chapter is initiated by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, 75 percent of all fines and forfeitures of bail shall be paid upon the collection by the proper officer of the court to the board to be deposited by it to the credit of the contingent fund of the Osteopathic Medical Board of California.

The payment to the board shall be made without placing the fine or forfeiture of bail in any special, contingent, or general fund in any city, county, or city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 359, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

2459.

The Osteopathic Medical Board of California shall not issue any drugless practitioner’s certificates under this chapter or any other law.

All persons holding drugless practitioner’s certificates may continue to practice under the authorization of their certificates and may renew them, subject to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 359, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

2459.4.

(a) On and after July 1, 2019, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), the board shall require a licensee to provide a separate disclosure that includes the licensee’s probation status, the length of the probation, the probation end date, all practice restrictions placed on the licensee by the board, the board’s telephone number, and an explanation of how the patient can find further information on the licensee’s probation on the licensee’s profile page on the board’s online license information Internet Web site, to a patient or the patient’s guardian or health care surrogate before the patient’s first visit following the probationary order while the licensee is on probation pursuant to a probationary order made on
 and after July 1, 2019, in any of the following circumstances:

(1) A final adjudication by the board following an administrative hearing or admitted findings or prima facie showing in a stipulated settlement establishing any of the following:

(A) The commission of any act of sexual abuse, misconduct, or relations with a patient or client as defined in Section 726 or 729.

(B) Drug or alcohol abuse directly resulting in harm to patients or the extent that such use impairs the ability of the
 licensee to practice safely.

(C) Criminal conviction
 directly involving harm to patient health.

(D) Inappropriate prescribing resulting in harm to patients and a probationary period of five years or more.

(2) An accusation or statement of issues alleged that the licensee committed any of the acts described in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1), and a stipulated settlement based upon a nolo contendre or other similar compromise that does not include any prima facie showing or admission of guilt or fact but does include
 an express acknowledgment that the disclosure requirements of this section would serve to protect the public interest.

(b) A licensee required to provide a disclosure pursuant to subdivision (a) shall obtain from the patient, or the patient’s guardian or health care surrogate, a separate, signed copy of that disclosure.

(c) A licensee shall not be required to provide a disclosure pursuant to subdivision (a) if any of the following applies:

(1) The patient is unconscious or otherwise unable to comprehend the disclosure and sign the copy of the disclosure pursuant to subdivision (b) and a guardian or health care surrogate is unavailable to comprehend the disclosure and sign the copy.

(2) The visit occurs in an emergency room or an urgent care facility or the visit is unscheduled, including consultations in inpatient facilities.

(3) The licensee who will be treating the patient during the visit is not known to the patient until immediately prior to the start of the visit.

(4) The licensee does not have a direct treatment relationship with the patient.

(d) On and after July 1, 2019, the board shall provide the following information, with respect to licensees on probation and licensees practicing under probationary licenses, in plain view on the licensee’s profile page on the board’s online license information Internet Web site.

(1) For probation imposed pursuant to a stipulated settlement, the causes alleged in the operative accusation along with a designation identifying those causes by which the licensee has expressly admitted guilt and a statement that acceptance of the settlement is not an admission of guilt.

(2) For probation imposed by an adjudicated decision of the board, the causes for probation stated in the final probationary order.

(3) For a licensee granted a probationary license, the causes by which the probationary license was imposed.

(4) The length of the probation and end date.

(5) All practice restrictions placed on the license by the board.

(e) A violation of this section shall not be punishable as a crime.

(f) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Board” means the Osteopathic Medical Board of California.

(2) “Licensee” means a person licensed by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 570, Sec. 5.   (SB 1448)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2459.5.

An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed pursuant to the Osteopathic Initiative Act may utilize the services of an aide to assist the osteopathic physician and surgeon in the rendering of osteopathic manipulative treatment. The aide shall at all times be under the orders, direction, and immediate supervision of the osteopathic physician and surgeon. Nothing in this section shall authorize an aide to function independently of the osteopathic physician and surgeon or shall be construed as authorizing an osteopathic aide to practice medicine, surgery, or any other form of healing art.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 873, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2459.6.

(a) For the purposes of Section 2459.5 and this section:

(1) “Osteopathic physician and surgeon” means a person defined in the Osteopathic Initiative Act.

(2) “Osteopathic manipulative treatment” means the therapeutic application of manually guided forces by an osteopathic physician and surgeon to alleviate somatic dysfunction.

(3) “Somatic dysfunction” means an impaired or altered function of related components of the somatic system.

(4) An “osteopathic aide” means an unlicensed person who assists an osteopathic physician and surgeon in the provision of osteopathic manipulative treatment provided that assistance is rendered under the supervision of an osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed pursuant to the Osteopathic Initiative Act. An aide is not authorized to perform osteopathic manipulative procedures.

(5) “Under the orders, direction and immediate supervision” means the evaluation of the patient by the osteopathic physician prior to the performing of an osteopathic manipulative treatment patient-related task by the aide, the formulation and recording in the patient’s record by the osteopathic physician and surgeon of an osteopathic manipulative treatment program based upon the evaluation, and any other information available to the osteopathic physician and surgeon prior to any delegation of a task to an aide. The osteopathic physician and surgeon shall assign only those patient-related tasks that can be safely and effectively performed by the aide. The supervising osteopathic physician and surgeon shall be responsible at all times for the conduct of the aide while he or she is on duty and shall provide continuous and immediate supervision of the aide. The osteopathic physician and surgeon shall be in the same facility as, and in proximity to, the location where the aide is performing patient-related tasks and shall be readily available at all times to provide advice or instructions to the aide.

(6) A “patient-related task” is restricted to assisting the osteopathic physician and surgeon in the rendering of osteopathic manipulative treatment.

(b) Osteopathic aides may not use roentgen rays and radioactive materials.

(c) The board shall require the supervising osteopathic physician and surgeon to conduct orientation of the aide regarding patient-related tasks.

(d) No osteopathic physician and surgeon shall supervise more than two osteopathic aides at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 873, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2459.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no osteopathic physician and surgeon shall utilize an osteopathic aide to perform services other than those specified in Sections 2459.5 and 2459.6. A violation of this section constitutes unprofessional conduct and is grounds for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 873, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 22. Podiatric Medicine [2460. - 2499.8.]

2460.

(a) There is created in the Department of Consumer Affairs the Podiatric Medical Board of California. Any reference in any provision of law to the California Board of Podiatric Medicine shall be deemed to refer to the Podiatric Medical Board of California. 

(b) The amendments made by Chapter 775 of the Statutes of 2017 relating to podiatrists shall not be construed to change any rights or privileges held by podiatrists prior to the enactment of that act.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 1.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2460.1.

Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of Section 2460 renders the Podiatric Medical Board of California subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 2.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2460.2.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Podiatric Medical Board of California in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2460.1 by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 3.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2461.

(a) As used in this article:

(1) “Board” means the Podiatric Medical Board of California.

(2) “Podiatric licensing authority” refers to any officer, board, commission, committee, or department of another state that may issue a license to practice podiatric medicine.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 102, Sec. 3.   (AB 2457)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2462.

The board shall consist of seven members, three of whom shall be public members. Not more than one member of the board shall be a full-time faculty member of a college or school of podiatric medicine.

The Governor shall appoint the four members qualified as provided in Section 2463 and one public member. The Senate Rules Committee and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 695, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2463.

Each member of the board, except the public members, shall be appointed from persons having all of the following qualifications:

(a) Be a citizen of this state for at least five years next preceding his or her appointment.

(b) Be a graduate of a recognized school or college of podiatric medicine.

(c) Have a valid certificate to practice podiatric medicine in this state.

(d) Have engaged in the practice of podiatric medicine in this state for at least five years next preceding his or her appointment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 655, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2464.

The public members shall be appointed from persons having all of the following qualifications:

(a) Be a citizen of this state for at least five years next preceding his or her appointment.

(b) Shall not be an officer or faculty member of any college, school, or other institution engaged in podiatric medical instruction.

(c) Shall not be a licentiate of the board or of any board under this division or of any board created by an initiative act under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 655, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

2465.

No person who directly or indirectly owns any interest in any college, school, or other institution engaged in podiatric medical instruction shall be appointed to the board nor shall any incumbent member of the board have or acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in any such college, school, or institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 14.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2466.

All members of the board shall be appointed for terms of four years. Vacancies shall immediately be filled by the appointing power for the unexpired portion of the terms in which they occur. No person shall serve as a member of the board for more than two consecutive terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2467.

(a) The board may convene from time to time as it deems necessary.

(b) Four members of the board constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting.

(c) It shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of those members present at a meeting, those members constituting at least a quorum, to pass any motion, resolution, or measure.

(d) The board shall elect from its members a president, a vice president, and a secretary who shall hold their respective positions at the pleasure of the board. The president may call meetings of the board and
 any duly appointed committee at a specified time and place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 489, Sec. 8.   (SB 1478)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2468.

Notice of each meeting of the board shall be given in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 836, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2469.

Each member of the board shall receive per diem and expenses as provided in Section 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 655, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

2470.

The board may adopt, amend, or repeal, in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), regulations necessary to enable the board to carry into effect the provisions of law relating to the practice of podiatric medicine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 4.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2471.

Except as provided by Section 159.5, the board may employ, within the limits of the funds received by the board, all personnel necessary to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 588, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2472.

(a) The certificate to practice podiatric medicine authorizes the holder to practice podiatric medicine.

(b) As used in this chapter, “podiatric medicine” means the diagnosis, medical, surgical, mechanical, manipulative, and electrical treatment of the human foot, including the ankle and tendons that insert into the foot and the nonsurgical treatment of the muscles and tendons of the leg governing the functions of the foot.

(c) A doctor of podiatric medicine shall not administer an anesthetic other than local. If an anesthetic other than local is required for any procedure, the anesthetic shall be administered by another licensed health care practitioner who is authorized to administer the required
 anesthetic within the scope of their practice.

(d) (1) A doctor of podiatric medicine may do the following:

(A) Perform surgical treatment of the ankle and tendons at the level of the ankle pursuant to subdivision (e).

(B) Perform services under the direct supervision of a physician and surgeon, as an assistant at surgery, in surgical procedures that are otherwise beyond the scope of practice of a doctor of podiatric medicine.

(C) Perform a partial amputation of the foot no further proximal than the Chopart’s joint.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to permit a doctor of podiatric medicine to function as a primary surgeon for any procedure beyond
 their scope of practice.

(e) A doctor of podiatric medicine may perform surgical treatment of the ankle and tendons at the level of the ankle only in the following locations:

(1) A licensed general acute care hospital, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) A licensed surgical clinic, as defined in Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, if the doctor of podiatric medicine has surgical privileges, including the privilege to perform surgery on the ankle, in a general acute care hospital described in paragraph (1) and meets all the protocols of the surgical clinic.

(3) An ambulatory surgical center that is certified to participate in the Medicare Program under Title XVIII (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq.) of the federal Social
 Security Act, if the doctor of podiatric medicine has surgical privileges, including the privilege to perform surgery on the ankle, in a general acute care hospital described in paragraph (1) and meets all the protocols of the surgical center.

(4) A freestanding physical plant housing outpatient services of a licensed general acute care hospital, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, if the doctor of podiatric medicine has surgical privileges, including the privilege to perform surgery on the ankle, in a general acute care hospital described in paragraph (1). For purposes of this section, a “freestanding physical plant” means any building that is not physically attached to a building where inpatient services are provided.

(5) An outpatient setting accredited pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1248.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a doctor of podiatric medicine with training or experience in wound care may treat ulcers resulting from local and systemic etiologies on the leg no further proximal than the tibial tubercle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 5.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2473.

(a) A doctor of podiatric medicine may independently prescribe and administer influenza and COVID-19 vaccines, consistent with recommendations adopted pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code, to persons three years of age or older.

(b) In order to prescribe and
 administer a vaccine described in subdivision (a), a doctor of podiatric medicine shall do all of the following:

(1) Complete an immunization training program biennially that is either offered by the CDC or taken through a registered provider approved by the board that, at a minimum, includes vaccine administration, prevention and management of adverse reactions, and maintenance of vaccine records.

(2) Comply with all state and federal recordkeeping and reporting requirements, including providing documentation to the patient’s primary care provider, if applicable, and entering in the information in the appropriate immunization registry designated by the Immunization Branch of the State Department of Public Health.

(c) The board may adopt regulations to implement this section. The adoption, amendment, repeal, or
 readoption of a regulation authorized by this section is deemed to address an emergency, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the board is hereby exempted for this purpose from the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code. For purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, the 180-day period, as applicable to the effective period of an emergency regulatory action and submission of specified materials to the Office of Administrative Law, is hereby extended to 240 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 6.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2474.

(a) Any person who uses in any sign or in any advertisement or otherwise, the word or words “doctor of podiatric medicine,” “doctor of podiatry,” “podiatric doctor,” “podiatric surgeon,” “D.P.M.,” “podiatrist,” “foot specialist,” or any other term or terms or any letters indicating or implying that they are a doctor of podiatric medicine, or that they practice podiatric medicine, or hold themselves out as practicing podiatric medicine or foot correction as defined in Section 2472, without having at the time of so doing a valid, unrevoked, and unsuspended certificate as provided for in this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) It is the policy of this state that a doctor of podiatric medicine shall be classified or treated as a doctor of podiatric medicine and
 shall not be classified or treated as an ancillary provider or other allied health professional in any health care setting or insurance reimbursement structure for any purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 6.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2475.

Unless otherwise provided by law, no postgraduate trainee, intern, resident postdoctoral fellow, or instructor may engage in the practice of podiatric medicine, or receive compensation therefor, or offer to engage in the practice of podiatric medicine unless he or she holds a valid, unrevoked, and unsuspended certificate to practice podiatric medicine issued by the board. However, a graduate of an approved college or school of podiatric medicine upon whom the degree doctor of podiatric medicine has been conferred, who is issued a resident’s license, which may be renewed annually for up to eight years for this purpose by the board, and who is enrolled in a postgraduate training program approved by the board, may engage in the practice of podiatric
 medicine whenever and wherever required as a part of that program and may receive compensation for that practice under the following conditions:

(a) A graduate with a resident’s license in an approved internship, residency, or fellowship program may participate in training rotations outside the scope of podiatric medicine, under the supervision of a physician and surgeon who holds a medical doctor or doctor of osteopathy degree wherever and whenever required as a part of the training program, and may receive compensation for that practice. If the graduate fails to receive a license to practice podiatric medicine under this chapter within three years from the commencement of the postgraduate training, all privileges and exemptions under this section shall automatically cease.

(b) Hospitals functioning as a part of the teaching program of an approved college or school of podiatric medicine in this state may exchange instructors or resident or assistant resident doctors of podiatric medicine with another approved college or school of podiatric medicine not located in this state, or those hospitals may appoint a graduate of an approved school as such a resident for purposes of postgraduate training. Those instructors and residents may practice and be compensated as provided in this section, but that practice and compensation shall be for a period not to exceed two years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 89.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2475.1.

Before a resident’s license may be issued, each applicant shall show by evidence satisfactory to the board, submitted directly to the board by the national score reporting institution, that he or she has, within the past 10 years, passed Parts I and II of the examination administered by the National Board of Podiatric Medical Examiners of the United States or has passed a written examination that is recognized by the board to be the equivalent in content to the examination administered by the National Board of Podiatric Medical Examiners of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 695, Sec. 14.2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2475.2.

As used in this article, “podiatric residency” means a program of supervised postgraduate clinical training, one year or more in duration, approved by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 655, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

2475.3.

(a) The board shall approve podiatric residency programs, as defined in Section 2475.2, in the field of podiatric medicine, for persons who are applicants for or have been issued a certificate to practice podiatric medicine pursuant to this article.

(b) The board may only approve a podiatric residency that it determines meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Reasonably conforms with the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education’s Institutional Requirements of the Essentials of Accredited Residencies in Graduate Medical Education: Institutional and Program Requirements.

(2) Is approved by the Council on Podiatric Medical Education.

(3) Complies with the requirements of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2476.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent a regularly matriculated student undertaking a course of professional instruction in an approved college or school of podiatric medicine from participating in training beyond the scope of podiatric medicine under the supervision of a physician and surgeon who holds a medical doctor or doctor of osteopathy degree whenever and wherever prescribed as part of his or her course of study.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1289, Sec. 11.4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2477.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits the manufacture, the recommendation, or the sale of either corrective shoes or appliances for the human feet.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2479.

The board shall issue a certificate to practice podiatric medicine to each applicant who meets the requirements of this chapter. Every applicant for a certificate to practice podiatric medicine shall comply with the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 2080) which are not specifically applicable to applicants for a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate, in addition to the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 90.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2480.

The board shall have full authority to investigate and to evaluate each applicant applying for a certificate to practice podiatric medicine and to make a determination of the admission of the applicant to the examination and the issuance of a certificate in accordance with the provisions and requirements of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 655, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

2481.

Each applicant who commenced professional instruction in podiatric medicine after September 1, 1959, shall show by an official transcript or other official evidence submitted directly to the board by the academic institution that he or she has completed two years of preprofessional postsecondary education, or its equivalent, including the subjects of chemistry, biology or other biological science, and physics or mathematics, before completing the resident course of professional instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 586, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2483.

(a) Each applicant for a certificate to practice podiatric medicine shall show by an official transcript or other official evidence satisfactory to the board that is submitted directly to the board by the academic institution that he or she has successfully completed a medical curriculum extending over a period of at least four academic years, or 32 months of actual instruction, in a college or school of podiatric medicine approved by the board. The total number of hours of all courses shall consist of a minimum of 4,000 hours.

The board, by regulation, shall adopt standards for determining equivalent training authorized by this section.

(b) The curriculum for all applicants shall provide for adequate instruction related to podiatric medicine in the following:

Alcoholism and other chemical substance detection

Local anesthesia

Anatomy, including embryology, histology, and neuroanatomy

Behavioral science

Biochemistry

Biomechanics-foot and ankle

Child abuse detection

Dermatology

Geriatric medicine

Human sexuality

Infectious diseases

Medical ethics

Neurology

Orthopedic surgery

Pathology, microbiology, and immunology

Pediatrics

Pharmacology, including materia medica and toxicology

Physical and laboratory diagnosis

Physical medicine

Physiology

Podiatric medicine

Podiatric surgery

Preventive medicine, including nutrition

Psychiatric problem detection

Radiology and radiation safety

Spousal or partner abuse detection

Therapeutics

Women’s health

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 586, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2484.

In addition to any other requirements of this chapter, before a certificate to practice podiatric medicine may be issued, each applicant shall show by evidence satisfactory to the board, submitted directly to the board by the sponsoring institution, that he or she has satisfactorily completed at least two years of postgraduate podiatric medical and podiatric surgical training in a general acute care hospital approved by the Council on Podiatric Medical Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 18.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2486.
